Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 29 DRAINAGE DISTRICTS
§ 42-2939. General powers of district.

All drainage districts organized under the provisions of this chapter shall have the right of eminent domain, with power by and through their boards of commissioners to cause to be condemned and appropriated private property for the use of said corporation in the construction and maintenance of a system of drainage, and to make just compensations therefor, to employ engineers, and such other assistants as may be necessary; to survey, plan, locate and estimate the cost of the works necessary for the reclamation of the lands of the district; to acquire and to hold by purchase, condemnation or other legal means, the right of way and the right to take material for the construction of all works necessary for the accomplishment of that object; to build and maintain drains, canals, sluices, bulkheads, water gates, levees and embankments; to establish and maintain pumping plants and to construct and maintain and keep in repair all works requisite and necessary to the end that the lands in the district may be reclaimed.

For the purpose of the drainage of any such district, the whole or any portion of any natural water course, or river, which drains such district, may be diked, improved, enlarged, widened, deepened or straightened, or any natural obstruction may be removed therefrom.

Said board of drainage commissioners shall have power to provide by contract for the performance and payment of all or any portion of the work requisite or necessary for the drainage of the lands included within the limits of such district, or to enter into any contract whereby all or any portion of the cost of such work shall be paid, assumed or undertaken by such district, and to do all things requisite or necessary for the drainage of said lands.

Work for the drainage of said lands may be performed either entirely or partly within the limits of such district, or of the county in which such district is located, or entirely or partly within or without the boundaries of any other county, state, territory or foreign country: provided, that the property of private corporations may be subjected to the same rights of eminent domain as that of private individuals: provided further, that the said board of commissioners shall have power to acquire by purchase all the real property necessary to make the improvements herein provided for.

§ 42-2940. Construction of works — Contracts.

After the organization of any drainage district, the commissioners of such drainage district shall proceed as soon as they may deem expedient in the construction of said improvements; and in carrying on said construction or any extensions thereof they shall have the power to employ such assistance as they may deem necessary and purchase all materials that may be necessary in the construction and carrying on of the work of said improvements, and shall have power to let the whole or any portion of said work to any responsible contractor; and shall in such case enter into all agreements with such contractor that may be necessary in the premises.

§ 42-2941. Contractors’ bonds.

In case the whole or any portion of said improvements is let to any contractor, said commissioners shall require the said contractor to give bond equal to fifty per cent (50%) of the amount of the contract price of the whole, or of the portion of said works covered by said contract, with two (2) or more sureties to be approved by the board of commissioners of said drainage district, and running to said district as obligee therein, conditioned for the faithful and accurate performance of said contract by said contractor, his executors, administrators or assigns, according to the terms and conditions of said agreement and conditioned that said contractor, his executors, administrators or assigns, performing the whole or any portion of said work under contract of said original contractor shall pay or cause to be paid all just claims for all persons performing labor or rendering services in the construction of said work under contract of said original contractor shall pay or cause to be paid all just claims of all persons performing labor or rendering services in the construction of said work, or furnishing materials, merchandise or provisions of any kind or character used by said contractor or subcontractor, or any employee thereof in the construction of said improvements: provided further, that no sureties on said bonds shall be liable thereon for labor, materials or provisions unless the persons or corporations performing said labor and furnishing said materials, goods, wares, merchandise, and provisions, shall within ninety days after the completion of said improvements, file their claim, duly verified, that the amount is just and due and remains unpaid, with the board of commissioners of said drainage district: and, provided further, that said commissioners before advertising for bids for any work or improvement may by resolution provide that said original contractor shall pay or cause to be paid monthly all just claims for all persons performing labor or rendering services in the construction of said work, or furnishing materials, merchandise or provisions of any kind or character used by said contractor or subcontractor or any employee thereof in the construction of said improvements; and before any second or subsequent estimate is paid to the said contractor said payments as aforesaid shall be evidenced by signed vouchers or waivers, filed with the commissioners, and such other evidence by affidavit, or otherwise, as the commissioners may require, and in which event the bond required for the faithful and accurate performance of the contract shall be twenty-five per cent (25%) of the contract price, and in advertising for proposals for bids the said proposals shall set forth that the contract will be let in accordance with the terms of said resolution as to the amount of the bond and the requirement for the payment as aforesaid of all bills for labor, materials, goods, wares, merchandise and provisions, but failure to make monthly settlement of all accounts as herein provided shall not invalidate the bond so furnished by said contractor.

§ 42-2942. Commencement and progress of work.

The work on said improvement shall begin at a point or at points to be determined by said commissioners, and said work shall be completed with all expedition possible, and said board of commissioners of such drainage district, or any contractor thereunder, shall have no power whatever to change such route or system of improvements or the manner of doing the work therein so as to make any radical changes in said improvements, without the written consent of all of the landowners to be benefited thereby, and of the landowners who may be damaged thereby.

§ 42-2943. Change of plans — Procedure in district court.

In case any substantial changes in said system of improvement, or the manner and construction thereof, shall be deemed necessary by said board of commissioners at any time during the progress thereof, and the written consent to such changes cannot be procured from said landowners, then said commissioners for and on behalf of said district, shall file a petition in the district court of the county within which said district is located, setting forth therein the changes which they deem necessary to be made in the plans or manner of the construction of said improvement, and praying therein to be permitted to make such changes.

Upon the filing of said petition the court shall cause a summons to be served, setting forth the prayer of said petition under the seal of the said court, which summons shall be served in the same manner as the service of summons in the case of the original petition, upon all the landowners or other persons having any lien or interest therein appearing of record in said district.

Any or all of said parties so served may appear in said cause and submit their objections thereto and after the time for the appearance of all said parties has expired, the court shall proceed to hear said petition at once, and if it appears during the course of said proceedings that the property rights of any of said landowners will be affected by such proposed change in said improvements, then the court, after having passed upon all preliminary questions as in the original proceedings, may call a jury to be impaneled in the manner provided by the Code of Civil Procedure, and upon the final hearing of said case the jury shall return a verdict finding the amount of damages, if any, sustained by all persons and corporations, the same as upon the original petition by reason of such proposed change, and the amount of compensation to be paid to any persons or corporation therefor, and for any additional right of way that may be necessary to be appropriated.

§ 42-2944. Payments to contractors.

During the construction of said improvement, said commissioners shall have the right to allow payment thereof, in installments as the work progresses, in proportion to the amount of work completed: provided, that no allowance or payment shall be made for said work to any contractor or subcontractor to exceed ninety per cent (90%) of the proportionate amount of the work completed by such contractor or subcontractor, and ten per cent (10%) of the contract price shall be reserved at all times by said board of commissioners until said work is wholly completed, and shall not be paid upon the completion of said work until ninety (90) days have expired for the presentation of all claims for labor performed and materials, goods, wares, merchandise and provisions furnished or used in the construction of said improvements. Upon the completion of said work and the payment of all claims hereinbefore provided for according to the terms and conditions of said contract, said commissioners shall accept said improvement and pay the contract price therefor.

§ 42-2945. Connections by private drains — Costs.

Any person or corporation owning land within said district shall have a right to connect any private drains or ditches for the proper drainage of such land with said system, and in case any person or corporation shall desire to drain such lands into said system, and shall find it necessary, in order to do so, to procure the right of way over the land of another, or others, and if consent thereto cannot be procured from such person or persons, then such landowner may present in writing a request to the board of commissioners of said district, setting forth therein the necessity of being able to connect his private drainage with said system, and pray therein that said system be extended to such point as he may designate in said writing, and immediately thereon said board of commissioners shall cause a petition to be filed in the district court for and in the name of said drainage district, requesting, in said petition, that said system be extended as requested, setting forth therein the necessity thereof and praying that leave be granted by the board to extend the system in accordance with the prayer of said petition, and the proceedings in such case, upon the presentation of such petition and the hearing thereof shall be, in all matters, the same as in the hearing and presentation of the original petition, for the establishment of the original system of drainage in said district, as far as applicable.

The costs in such proceedings shall be paid from the assessment of benefits to be made on the lands of the person or persons benefited by such extension, and the assessment and compensation for the right of way, damages and benefits and payment of damages and compensation, and the collection of the assessments for benefits shall be the same as in the proceedings under the original petition, and the construction of the said extension shall be made under the same provisions as the construction of the original improvement; and all things that may be done or performed in connection therewith shall be, as near as may be applicable, in accordance with the provisions already set forth herein for the establishment and construction of said original improvement: provided, that such petitioner or petitioners shall, at the time of filing such petition by said drainage commissioners, enter into a good and sufficient bond to said drainage district, in the full penal sum of $500, with two or more sureties to be approved by the court, conditioned for the payment of all costs in case the prayer of said petitioner shall not be granted, which bond shall be filed in said court.

§ 42-2946. Connection of district with lower district — Costs.

In case of the establishment of a drainage district and system of drainage under the provisions of this chapter above any other district that may theretofore have been established, and above any other system of drainage that may have theretofore been constructed in said district, and in case said district to be established above may desire to connect its drainage system with the lower or servient district, the latter district shall be made a party to the proceedings for the establishment of such system, and the petition to be filed in the district court for the establishment of the system of drainage in said upper district shall in addition to the facts hereinbefore provided and required to be set forth therein, set forth the fact that said lower system in said lower district is necessary to be used as an outlet for the system of drainage of said upper district, and that the same will be sufficient outlet and will afford sufficient capacity to carry the drainage of both said upper and lower districts; and in case said system of said lower district will be required to be enlarged by widening or deepening the same, or both, in order to give sufficient outlet to said upper district and afford sufficient drainage for said upper and lower districts, then the plans and specifications for enlarging the system of said lower district shall be filed with said petition in addition to the other data hereinbefore provided for in this chapter.

All the landowners in said lower district, or any person claiming interest therein as mortgagee or otherwise, shall be made parties defendant in said petition, and the proceedings therein as to the assessment of damages and compensation for land taken, if any be necessary to be taken in enlarging said lower system, shall be the same as in the establishment of systems of drainage in the lower or servient district as hereinbefore provided for; but the jury, in addition to the facts to be found by them as provided for in the establishment of a drainage system in the lower district, shall find and determine whether said lower system, when improved according to the plans and specifications filed with the said petition, will afford sufficient drainage for both said upper and lower districts, which finding shall be made by the jury before considering any other question at issue in said proceedings, and in case said jury should find that the system of said lower district when improved as proposed in said petition would not be sufficient, then in that case said findings shall terminate the proceedings, and no further proceedings in said case shall be had, and the costs of said proceedings shall be paid as costs in other proceedings, as hereinbefore provided for; but in such case the finding of said jury shall not terminate the objects of said upper district or operate to disorganize the same, but said upper district may begin new proceedings for the establishment of a system of drainage with some new outlet provided therein.

All costs for the enlarging or improving of said lower system that may be required, shall be assessed to the landowners in the upper district according to the benefits to be derived from the construction of said entire system, and no additional cost shall be thrown upon the lower district, and all compensation for taking any right of way that may be necessary to be taken in enlarging said lower system and all damages occurring therefrom, if any, to the landowners of said lower district, shall be ascertained and paid in the same manner as hereinbefore provided for the adjustment of compensation and damages in the establishment of drainage systems in lower districts.
Said lower district, by and through its board of commissioners, may appear in said cause and show therein any injury it may sustain as a district by reason of the additional cost of maintenance per annum which will be sustained by said lower district by reason of said enlarging or improving of the same, and judgment shall be rendered in favor of said lower district against said upper district for such an amount as found, and the same shall be paid each year as the cost of construction is paid as provided for in this chapter, and the amount so paid shall be held by said lower district as an additional fund for the maintenance of its said system as improved and enlarged by said upper district.

§ 42-2947. Use of natural watercourses and previously constructed works.

The whole or any portion of any natural watercourse which drains any district established under this chapter, or the whole or any portion of any ditch or drainage system already constructed or partially constructed prior to the passage of this chapter, or which may be constructed subsequent thereto, may be improved and completed as a system under the provisions of this chapter: provided, that the owner or owners of any land upon or in which any drainage system has been established or constructed in whole or in part or which may hereafter be constructed in whole or in part, may take advantage of the provisions of this chapter to organize same as a drainage district, for the purpose of completing same or for the purpose of making provision for the payment or funding of any indebtedness incurred in the construction of such system, or either; and providing for the maintenance thereof. The procedure to be followed in such case shall be the same as is herein provided for the organization of a drainage district in the first instance to the extent that same is applicable to the situation: provided, that the necessary changes and substitutions therein may be made: provided further, that in the improvement of any natural watercourse, the rights of the public therein for the purpose of navigation shall not be in any wise impaired.

§ 42-2948. Construction of dikes along public roads.

In the construction of any diking system under the provisions of this chapter, where it is desired to construct the same along the right of way of any public road which has theretofore been legally established, said district shall have a right to construct its dikes along such road: provided, that the dikes so constructed along such road shall not destroy or impair the same for use as a public highway; and in case of the construction or improvement of any dike along any public highway, such dike shall be constructed of sufficient width and in such manner as will be of use as a public highway.

§ 42-2949. Payments of claims — Option for deposit and disbursement of funds — Issuance of checks or warrants — Investment of funds.

The board of commissioners may issue warrants of such district, in payment of claims of indebtedness against such district; such warrants shall be in form and substance the same as county warrants, or as near the same as may be practicable and shall draw the legal rate of interest from the date of their presentation to the treasurer for payment, as hereinafter provided, and shall be signed by the chairman and attested by the secretary of said board: provided, that no warrants shall be issued by said board of commissioners in payment of any indebtedness of such district for less than face or par value.

The board of commissioners may, in the alternative and as an option to subsection (1) of this section, elect by resolution to receive moneys due the district from the levy of taxes, assessments and other sources, to provide for the safekeeping and deposit of such moneys in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code, and to pay all claims of indebtedness of the district allowed and approved by either warrant or check. If a drainage district elects this option, a certified copy of said resolution shall be served upon the board of county commissioners, the county auditor and the county treasurer. Upon allowance of claims by the board of commissioners, payment may be ordered by warrant or check signed by the chairman and the secretary. The secretary may be directed by resolution or order of the board to invest surplus funds in accordance with and subject to the provisions of chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code, and section 50-1013, Idaho Code. The board of commissioners shall cause to be kept an accurate account of all moneys received, the sources from whence received, all moneys expended and the purposes to which applied.

§ 42-2950. Warrants — Payment — Interest.

All warrants issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be presented by the holder thereof to the county treasurer, who shall indorse thereon the day of presentation for payment, with the additional indorsement thereof in case of nonpayment that they are not paid for want of funds; and no warrant shall draw interest under the provisions of this chapter until it is so presented and indorsed by the county treasurer. And it shall be the duty of such treasurer, from time to time, when he has sufficient funds in his hands for that purpose, to advertise in the newspaper doing the county printing for the presentation to him for payment of as many of the outstanding warrants as he may be able to pay: provided, that thirty (30) days after the first publication of said notice of the treasurer calling in any of said outstanding warrants, said warrants shall cease to bear interest, which shall be stated in the notice. Said notice shall be published two (2) weeks consecutively, and said warrants shall be called in and paid in the order of their indorsement.

If a board of commissioners has elected and complied with the provisions of section 42-2949(1), Idaho Code, and in the absence of funds to pay warrants issued, the board may by resolution order payment of warrants presented by registering such warrants as hereinafter provided, and at the same time shall prescribe the interest rate said warrants shall draw. All warrants issued shall be presented to the secretary of a drainage district by the persons holding the same. If there are insufficient funds to pay the warrants presented, the secretary must indorse thereon “not paid for want of funds,” the date of indorsement, the rate of interest such warrant shall draw as fixed by resolution of the board of commissioners, and sign his name thereto; and thereafter the said warrant shall draw interest at the rate specified in such indorsement until called for payment. Warrants issued by a drainage district shall be paid in the order of their issuance from funds accruing for the year in which they are issued. After all outstanding indebtedness for any one (1) year has been paid, any balance for that year shall be transferred to a warrant redemption fund for payment of uncalled registered warrants. Where there is no outstanding indebtedness nor any uncalled registered warrants, any balance may be used for the payment of current expenses for the next fiscal year.

§ 42-2951. Legalization of warrants issued under former act.

Whenever any territory of the state of Idaho heretofore organized as a drainage district under the provisions of sections 2444 to 2483 inclusive, of the Revised Codes, shall be hereafter organized as a drainage district under the provisions of a subsequent drainage law, all debts incurred and warrants issued by the commissioners of said drainage district as heretofore organized, shall be and hereby are made legal and valid obligations against the district as organized under such subsequent drainage law: provided, however, that all debts incurred and warrants issued shall be reported to the district court by the commissioners who incurred said indebtedness or issued said warrants, or by any one of said commissioners, under oath, and be certified to as correct by the district judge of the county in which said district was located; and after such certification said district judge shall order a levy made for the payment of said obligations, and the taxes shall be collected the same as general taxes are collected: provided, however, that any creditor of any drainage district organized under sections 2444 to 2483 inclusive, of the Revised Codes, shall have the right of suit against said district, after reasonable notice of his claim to the commissioners therein, and their neglect or refusal to report said claim to the district court for certification as to its correctness: provided further, that in cases where the district as organized under a subsequent drainage law shall include other lands than were included in the district originally organized under sections 2444 to 2483 inclusive, of the Revised Codes, upon the certification of the correctness of the debts incurred and warrants issued by the commissioners of said district, by the district judge as herein provided, such debts incurred and warrants issued shall be deemed to be obligations upon the lands embraced within the limits of the district as originally organized under said sections 2444 to 2483 inclusive, of the Revised Codes, and be collected as herein provided.

§ 42-2952. Bonds authorized.

Upon the establishment of any drainage district under the provisions of this chapter, and the establishment of a system of drainage therein as provided for in this chapter, the board of commissioners of such drainage district are hereby authorized to issue bonds to pay for the total cost of the work and improvements incurred or to be incurred, or of the part of the work and improvements assumed or contracted for, or to be assumed or contracted for, together with the cost of the organization of said district, and the establishment thereof, including damages assessed and compensation made or to be made to landowners for right of way, and the expense and cost of the entire proceedings, payable as provided by section 42-2954[, Idaho Code]: provided, that no bonds shall, under the provisions hereof, be sold for less than their par value; and, provided further, that the total amount of the foregoing bonds shall not exceed ninety per cent (90%) of the assessments levied against the lands of the district for the payment of the cost and expense of the foregoing items.

The board of commissioners of any such drainage district is also hereby authorized to issue additional bonds, in an amount equal to, and payable from, the additional assessments which may be levied pursuant to and under the authorization expressed in section 42-2930[, Idaho Code].

The board of commissioners of any such drainage district is also authorized to issue additional bonds sufficient in amount to pay the total cost of the additional work and improvements and of the separate and additional works and improvements authorized by the foregoing section 42-2931[, Idaho Code,] including the cost and expense of the costs of collection of the assessments therein authorized and of all legal and other proceedings incident to or had in connection with the ordering, authorization and doing of all such works and improvements by said board of commissioners or in connection with the court proceedings which shall be had under the provisions of this chapter.

The board of commissioners of any such drainage district is also authorized to issue additional bonds sufficient in amount to pay and redeem all or any part of the outstanding warrant or other indebtedness of said district, together with interest accrued thereon. The funding hereby authorized may be accomplished by the exchange of such funding bonds for the warrant indebtedness or other indebtedness thus to be funded, if consented to by the board of commissioners and by the owners of such outstanding warrants and other indebtedness; provided that such funding bonds shall not bear a higher rate of interest than the warrants and other indebtedness thereby funded and that such funding bonds shall be exchanged at not less than their par value and accrued interest; provided, however, that no warrant or other indebtedness shall be funded under the provisions of this paragraph, except such warrants and other indebtedness which have been issued and incurred prior to July 1, 1935.

In the event that the owners of such outstanding warrants and other indebtedness shall not consent to such exchange, such funding bonds shall be sold as required by section 42-2953[, Idaho Code], and such warrants and other outstanding indebtedness and obligations shall be called and retired as provided in said section 42-2953[, Idaho Code]; provided, that all funds in the treasury of such district available for the payment or redemption of such warrants and other indebtedness shall be first applied to the payment and redemption of such warrants and other indebtedness together with the interest accrued thereon, and such funding bonds shall be issued for the retirement of the indebtedness remaining unpaid.
The foregoing bonds may be issued jointly or separately, as a unit bond issue or as separate bond issues as determined by the board of commissioners. Any or all of the bond issues authorized by this section may also be issued, if deemed advisable by the board of commissioners, as a part of a joint bond issue with drainage district refunding bonds authorized by and issued under the provisions of chapter 30 or under any other enabling acts of this state. The foregoing bonds shall be payable solely out of and from the assessments for benefits levied upon and a lien upon the lands within such drainage district, as provided elsewhere in this chapter; and all said assessments (as to the determination, apportionment and assessment thereof, objections thereto and hearing thereon and confirmation thereof, as to their nature and existence as a lien upon the lands thus assessed, as to appeals therefrom and their incontestability, as to the certification and entry thereof of record and upon the tax rolls of the county, as to collection thereof and as to tax sale of delinquent lands and redemption thereof, as to the times when such assessments shall become due and payable and be called and in what amounts, as to annual levies thereof for the liquidation of bonds at maturity and for the payment of interest thereon; and as to the mode, manner and time of doing all the foregoing, and in all other respects), shall be governed by, and shall be provided in, sections 42-2914, 42-2915, 42-2919 to 42-2929[, Idaho Code], inclusive and section 42-2934[, Idaho Code,] to section 42-2936[, Idaho Code], both inclusive, and sections 42-2956 and 42-2958[, Idaho Code], and the other related provisions, of chapter 29[, title 42, Idaho Code,] and as provided in this act. Provided that the foregoing funding bonds shall be paid by assessments levied upon and apportioned over the lands within the drainage district as provided by sections 42-2951 and 42-2962[, Idaho Code].

§ 42-2953. Funding bonds.

Such commissioners may, at any time thereafter, issue such bonds in the manner and form herein prescribed for the purpose of funding any outstanding warrants or obligations of such district. In case of such last-named issue all the outstanding warrants shall immediately become due and payable upon receipt of the money by the county treasurer from the sale of said bonds, and upon a call of such outstanding obligations to be issued by him. Such call shall be made by said treasurer immediately upon the receipt of the proceeds from the sale of said bonds, by publication for two (2) consecutive weeks in the county paper authorized to do the county printing, and such warrants and outstanding obligations shall cease to draw interest at the end of thirty days after the date of the first publication.

§ 42-2954. Form of bonds — Interest — Maturities.

Said bonds shall be numbered from one (1) upward, consecutively, and be in denominations of not less than $100 nor more than $1000. They shall bear the date of issue, shall be made payable to the bearer and bear interest, payable semi-annually, with coupons attached for each interest payment. The bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, and shall be attested by the secretary of said board, and the seal of such district shall be affixed to each bond, but not to the coupons. The coupons may be signed by the facsimile lithographed or engraved signatures of the said officers.

The board of commissioners shall fix the maturities of said bonds not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of their issuance and an amortization period which shall be not less than three-fourths (¾) of the maximum maturity. During the first fourth of the period covered by the last maturity provision may be made, in the discretion of the board, for the payment of interest only. Maturities shall be so arranged that during at least the latter three-fourths (¾) of the period covered by the last maturity the principal shall be amortized by payments thereof in annual or semi-annual instalments so arranged as to maturities that the combined principal and interest payments during the amortization period shall be approximately the same each year. Said bonds shall be payable at such place within or without the state of Idaho as may be designated by the board of commissioners. The issuing drainage district may reserve the right to redeem said bonds or any of them at any time after ten (10) years from date thereof.

§ 42-2955. Exchange of bonds for warrants.

Said bonds may be exchanged at not less than their par value for an equal amount of the warrants of the district issuing such bonds.

§ 42-2956. Levy for sinking fund.

At least one (1) year before the first principal maturity of said bonds (as fixed by the board of commissioners pursuant to section 42-2954[, Idaho Code,]) and thereafter annually, the drainage commissioners of such district issuing them are hereby authorized and required to levy an assessment sufficient to liquidate said bonds at their respective maturities. Such assessment shall be collected by the official whose duty it is to collect the county taxes, and kept as a separate fund for the sole purpose of liquidating said bonds in accordance with the provisions of the following section. The annual levies of assessments to pay bonds issued prior to the effective date of this amendment shall be made according to the law in existence at the time of the issuance of said prior bonds and according to the maturity needs thereof.

§ 42-2957. Calling of bonds.

It shall be the duty of the treasurer of any county in which there may be a district issuing bonds under the provisions of this chapter whenever he has upon hand $5000 of the special fund for the payment of said bonds, and when said bonds shall have run for a period of three (3) years, to advertise in the newspaper doing the county printing, for the presentation to him for payment of as many of the bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter as he is able to pay with the funds in his hands, to be paid in numerical order of said bonds, beginning with the bond number one (1), until all of said bonds are paid: provided, that thirty (30) days after the first publication of said notice of the treasurer calling in any of said bonds, said bonds shall cease to bear interest.

§ 42-2958. Levy for interest.

It shall be the duty of such drainage commissioners annually to levy an assessment sufficient for the payment of the coupons hereinbefore mentioned as they fall due.

§ 42-2959. Registration of bonds.

Before the bonds are delivered to the purchaser they shall be presented to the county treasurer, who shall register them in a book kept for that purpose, and known as the bond register, in which register he shall enter the number of each bond, the date of issue, the maturity, amount and rate of interest, to whom and when payable, and the proceeds derived from the sale of said bonds shall in all cases be paid by the purchaser thereof to the county treasurer.

§ 42-2960. Maintenance of system — District not to be operated for profit.

Any drainage district organized under the provisions of this chapter is not to be conducted or operated for profit or with the view of paying dividends, but solely for the benefit and welfare of the residents and property owners of said district.

§ 42-2961. Apportionment of cost of maintenance.

The board of commissioners of any drainage district organized under the provisions of this chapter shall, on or before the third Monday of September of each year, make an estimate of the cost of maintenance of the drainage system constructed in such district, which estimate shall include the cost of making any necessary repairs that it might become necessary to make in the maintenance of such system. Such estimate shall be made for the succeeding year, and the amount so estimated shall be certified by the board of commissioners to the auditor of the county in which such district is located, on or before said date, and the amount thereof shall be apportioned to the landowners in such district benefited by said improvement in proportion to the benefit apportioned or reapportioned, and such amount shall be added to the general taxes of such landowners and collected therewith; provided however, that at the option of the commissioners the amount apportioned to every landowner on any parcel or piece of land shall be not less than one dollar ($1.00), which amount shall be a minimum assessment to be collected as a tax for the year on every such parcel or piece of land.

§ 42-2962. Levy of and limitation on assessments.

The commissioners may also levy assessments for any expense necessarily incurred by them for construction, maintenance, repair, or any extraordinary reasons, and also may add to said assessment sufficient to pay any deficiency occurring the preceding year or any other unpaid warrant indebtedness, if any, or to pay any outstanding warrants: provided, that any assessments to be hereafter made by any drainage commissioners to pay for the payment or retirement of any bonds or warrants shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the original cost of organization and construction, and said assessment for the payment or retirement of any bonds or warrants shall be in addition to the assessments which may be levied under this section or section 42-2936, Idaho Code, and such assessments, when made, shall be apportioned under section 42-2961, Idaho Code, and collected as hereinbefore provided for.

§ 42-2963. Validation of warrants heretofore issued.

Warrants or any other evidence of drainage district indebtedness heretofore issued by the board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district for such necessary construction, maintenance, repair or any extraordinary reasons, shall be and hereby are made legal and valid obligations of such drainage district.

§ 42-2964. Interpretation of law.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to promote the public health and welfare by reclaiming wet or overflowed lands, building embankments or levees and the preservation of any system of drainage heretofore constructed or to be constructed according to law.